Utah statutes.
26-50-202.   Traumatic Brain Injury Advisory Committee -- Membership -- Time limit.

(1)  On or after July 1 of each year, the executive director may create a Traumatic Brain Injury Advisory Committee of not more than nine members.

(2)  The committee shall be composed of members of the community who are familiar with traumatic brain injury, its causes, diagnosis, treatment, rehabilitation, and support services, including:

(a)  persons with a traumatic brain injury;

(b)  family members of a person with a traumatic brain injury;

(c)  representatives of an association which advocates for persons with traumatic brain injuries;

(d)  specialists in a profession that works with brain injury patients; and

(e)  department representatives.

(3)  The department shall provide staff support to the committee.

(4) (a)  If a vacancy occurs in the committee membership for any reason, a replacement may be appointed for the unexpired term.

(b)  The committee shall elect a chairperson from the membership.

(c)  A majority of the committee constitutes a quorum at any meeting, and, if a quorum exists, the action of the majority of members present shall be the action of the committee.

(d)  The committee may adopt bylaws governing the committee's activities.

(e)  A committee member may be removed by the executive director:

(i)  if the member is unable or unwilling to carry out the member's assigned responsibilities; or

(ii)  for good cause.

(5)  The committee shall comply with the procedures and requirements of:

(a)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act; and

(b)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but, at the executive director's discretion, may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(7)  Not later than November 30 of each year the committee shall provide a written report summarizing the activities of the committee to:

(a)  the executive director of the department;

(b)  the Health and Human Services Interim Committee; and

(c)  the Social Services Appropriations Subcommittee.

(8)  The committee shall cease to exist on December 31 of each year, unless the executive director determines it necessary to continue.

